Utah statutes.
35A-1-103.   Department of Workforce Services -- Creation -- Seal.
(1)  There is created the Department of Workforce Services, which has all of
the policymaking functions, regulatory and enforcement powers, rights, duties,
and responsibilities outlined in this title.
(2)  For purposes of this title, the department shall have an official seal
that shall be judicially noticed.
